Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-412
Survey record repository; established.

The State Surveyor shall establish a survey record repository in the city of Lincoln. The State Surveyor shall employ all individuals necessary to staff such repository and may, with the approval of the Board of Educational Lands and Funds, set the salaries of such employees.

Laws 1982, LB 127, § 15.